Nevada, session 83, SB93.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 232 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that:
1. The State of Nevada is poised to see a once-in-a-generation
wave of federal money resulting from the passage of the
Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law 117-58, and
the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, which
will help to close the digital divide and increase the development of
broadband services and infrastructure across the State;
2. The State of Nevada needs to ensure that this historic
investment creates long-lasting broadband infrastructure that is
built by a well-trained workforce;
3. Work performed by an unqualified contractor with a
poorly trained workforce endangers the public and is not in the
best interest of the citizens of this State; and
4. Proper stewardship of public money will require that the
State of Nevada implement appropriate measures to ensure that
any grants of federal money awarded by this State for the
development of broadband services and infrastructure prioritize
issuing grants to applicants that will ensure the work is performed
safely and by a well-trained workforce and that the applicant
provides quality jobs to Nevada workers.
Sec. 3. 1. In awarding any grant of federal money for the
development of broadband services and infrastructure in
accordance with federal law, each state agency shall:
(a) Evaluate and assign a score to each application for the
grant received by the state agency based on the factors and relative
weights assigned to each factor that the state agency specified in
the request for grant applications; and
(b) When ranking the proposals, assign a relative weight of 30
percent to an application if the applicant submits a signed
certification attesting that the applicant meets the requirements of
paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 2.
2. An applicant for a grant of federal money for the
development of broadband services and infrastructure shall
submit to a state agency with the application for the grant a signed
statement certifying that:
(a) If the applicant:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(1) Will perform some or all of the work that is financed in
whole or in part with the grant money or if such work will be
performed by a provider of broadband services, the applicant or
provider, as applicable, meets the requirements set forth in
paragraph (b) or (c); and
(2) Will subcontract some or all of the work that is financed
in whole or in part with the grant money, the subcontractor meets
the requirements set forth in paragraph (b) or (c);
(b) The applicant, provider of broadband services or
contractor, as applicable:
(1) Has a training program that is appropriate for the work
to be performed by the applicant, provider or contractor, as
applicable, and is capable of providing, upon request,
documentation that:
(I) Demonstrates that the applicant, provider or
contractor, as applicable, has the ability and financial means to
provide such a training program;
(II) Shows that the applicant, provider or contractor, as
applicable, has a recruitment policy and an equal opportunity
policy;
(III) Shows that the applicant, provider or contractor, as
applicable, provides, at least twice each year, information
concerning the content of the training program and the times at
which the training program is offered; and
(IV) Demonstrates that the applicant, provider or
contractor, as applicable, has actually provided the training
program before submitting the application;
(2) Requires safety training, including, without limitation,
an OSHA-10 course for employees and an OSHA-30 course for
supervisory employees, that is appropriate for the work to be
performed;
(3) Requires work performed by the applicant, provider or
contractor, as applicable, that is financed in whole or in part with
the grant money will be performed by employees who are directly
employed by the applicant, provider or contractor, as applicable,
and that such workers will receive high-quality wages that are not
less than the appropriate prevailing wage in the region determined
pursuant to NRS 338.030 and a health benefit plan for employees,
which includes coverage for dependents of an employee; and
(4) Employs a qualified local workforce of which not less
than 50 percent of employees are residents of this State and
conducts a program to promote the hiring of residents of this
State; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(c) The applicant, provider of broadband services or contractor
licensed pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS that will perform some or
all of the work is a signatory to a collective bargaining agreement
that covers all non-supervisory employees directly employed by the
applicant, provider or contractor, as applicable, who will perform
any work financed in whole or in part with the grant money.
3. Any certification submitted by an applicant for a grant
pursuant to subsection 2 must be made available on the Internet
website of the state agency which awarded the grant.
4. In addition to the requirements of subsections 1 and 2 and
except as otherwise provided in federal law, each state agency
shall require as a condition of any grant of federal money for the
development of broadband services and infrastructure in
accordance with federal law that is awarded by the state agency
that:
(a) Any certification provided by the applicant pursuant to
subsection 2 is binding upon the applicant who is awarded the
grant money; and
(b) If an applicant, provider of broadband services or
contractor performs any work that requires a contractor’s license
issued pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS and is financed in whole or
in part with the grant money, the provisions of NRS 338.020 to
338.090, inclusive, shall apply.
5. If any federal statute or regulation precludes the granting
of federal assistance or reduces the amount of that assistance for a
particular grant because of the provisions of this section, the
provisions of this section do not apply insofar as their application
would preclude or reduce federal assistance for that work.
6. Any state agency that awards a grant of federal money for
the development of broadband services and infrastructure
pursuant to this section may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Health benefit plan for employees” means a health
benefit plan that is provided by an employer to an employee which
arranges for the payment of, payment for or reimbursement of any
of the costs of health care services.
(b) “OSHA-10 course” means a 10-hour course developed by
the Occupational Safety and Health Administration of the United
States Department of Labor.
(c) “OSHA-30 course” means a 30-hour course developed by
the Occupational Safety and Health Administration of the United
States Department of Labor.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(d) “State agency” means every public agency, bureau, board,
commission, department, division, officer or employee of the
Executive Department of the State Government.
(e) “Supervisory employee” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 618.967.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)